en: Can Crushers
xx: Can Crushers
cs: Drtiče na plechovky
da: Dåseknusere
de: Dosenpressen
es: Aplastadores de latas
fr: Écraseurs de canettes
it: Schiaccia lattine
ja: あき缶つぶし器
nl: Blikpersen
no: Boksknusere
pl: Zgniatarki do puszek
pt: Trituradores de latas
ru: Прессы для банок
sv: Burkkrossare
tr: Konserve Kutusu Eziciler

en: Can Openers
xx: Can Openers
cs: Otvíráky na konzervy
da: Dåseåbnere
de: Dosenöffner
es: Abrelatas
fr: Ouvre-boîtes
it: Apri lattine
ja: 缶切り・栓抜き
nl: Blikopeners
no: Boksåpnere
pl: Otwieracze do puszek
pt: Abridores de latas
ru: Открывалки для банок
sv: Konservöppnare
tr: Konserve Açıcılar

en: Carving Forks
xx: Carving Forks
cs: Vidličky na porcování masa
da: Forskærergafler
de: Fleischgabeln
es: Tenedores trinchantes
fr: Fourchettes à découper
it: Forchettoni
ja: カービングフォーク
nl: Vleesvorken
no: Stekegafler
pl: Widelce do drobiu
pt: Garfos para carne
ru: Вилки для разделки мяса
sv: Tranchergafflar
tr: Et Servis Çatalları

en: Channel Knives
xx: Channel Knives
cs: Škrábací nože
da: Juliennejern
de: Ziseliermesser
es: Acanaladores
fr: Zesteurs
it: Sbuccia arance
ja: チャンネルナイフ
nl: Citrusschillers
no: Garnityrkniver
pl: Obieraki do cytrusów
pt: Descascadores
ru: Ножи-декораторы
sv: Garnityrknivar
tr: Süsleme Bıçakları

en: Colanders & Strainers
xx: Colanders & Strainers
cs: Cedníky a filtry
da: Dørslag og sigter
de: Abtropf- & Küchensiebe
es: Coladores y filtros
fr: Passoires et filtres
it: Scolapasta e colini
ja: 水切りボウル・ざる
nl: Vergieten en zeven
no: Dørslag og siler
pl: Durszlaki i sitka
pt: Peneiras e escorredores
ru: Дуршлаги и сита
sv: Durkslag och silar
tr: Kevgirler ve Süzgeçler

en: Condiment Dispensers
xx: Condiment Dispensers
cs: Dávkovače ochucovadel
da: Krydderibeholdere
de: Saucenspender
es: Dispensadores de condimentos
fr: Distributeurs de condiments
it: Dosatori per condimenti
ja: 調味料入れ
nl: Specerijdispensers
no: Sausdispensere
pl: Dozowniki przypraw
pt: Recipiente para condimentos
ru: Дозаторы приправ
sv: Såsbehållare
tr: Sos Dispenserleri

en: Cookie Cutters
xx: Cookie Cutters
cs: Vykrajovátka na cukroví
da: Småkageforme
de: Ausstechförmchen
es: Moldes de galletas
fr: Emporte-pièces
it: Formine per biscotti
ja: クッキー型
nl: Koekjesvormen
no: Småkakeformer
pl: Foremki do ciastek
pt: Cortadores de biscoitos
ru: Формы-ножи для печений
sv: Kakformar
tr: Kurabiye Kalıpları

en: Cookie Presses
xx: Cookie Presses
cs: Lisy na cukroví
da: Kagesprøjter
de: Keksmaschine
es: Prensa para galletas
fr: Presses à biscuits
it: Stampi per biscotti
ja: クッキープレス
nl: Koekjespersen
no: Småkakepresser
pl: Rękawy cukiernicze
pt: Prensas de biscoito
ru: Прессы для печенья
sv: Spritspåsar
tr: Kurabiye Baskıları

en: Cooking Thermometer Accessories
xx: Cooking Thermometer Accessories
cs: Kuchyňské teploměry – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til stegetermometer
de: Küchenthermometer-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para termómetros de cocina
fr: Accessoires pour thermomètres de cuisson
it: Accessori per termometri da cucina
ja: 料理用温度計関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor kookthermometers
no: Tilbehør til steketermometre
pl: Akcesoria do termometrów kuchennych
pt: Acessórios para termômetro de cozinha
ru: Принадлежности для кулинарных термометров
sv: Tillbehör för kökstermometrar
tr: Pişirme Termometresi Aksesuarları

en: Cooking Thermometers
xx: Cooking Thermometers
cs: Kuchyňské teploměry
da: Stegetermometre
de: Kochthermometer
es: Termómetros de cocina
fr: Thermomètres de cuisson
it: Termometri per biscotti
ja: 料理用温度計
nl: Kookthermometers
no: Steketermometre
pl: Termometry spożywcze
pt: Termômetros para cozinha
ru: Кухонные термометры
sv: Matlagningstermometrar
tr: Yemek Isıölçerleri

en: Cooking Timers
xx: Cooking Timers
cs: Kuchyňské minutky
da: Æggeure
de: Kurzzeitmesser & Eieruhren
es: Cronómetros de cocina
fr: Minuteurs de cuisson
it: Timer da cottura
ja: キッチンタイマー
nl: Kookwekkers
no: Stekeur
pl: Minutniki kuchenne
pt: Temporizadores para cozinha
ru: Кухонные таймеры
sv: Äggklockor
tr: Pişirme Zamanlayıcıları

en: Cooking Torches
xx: Cooking Torches
cs: Flambovací pistole
da: Flamberingsbrændere
de: Flambierbrenner
es: Soplete para cocinar
fr: Chalumeaux de cuisine
it: Torce da cucina
ja: 料理用バーナー
nl: Kookbranders
no: Mat-blåselamper
pl: Opalarki kuchenne
pt: Tochas de cozinha
ru: Кулинарные горелки
sv: Gasbrännare
tr: Mutfak Pürmüzleri

en: Cooling Racks
xx: Cooling Racks
cs: Chladicí regály
da: Afkølingsriste
de: Abkühlgitter
es: Parrillas de enfriamiento
fr: Supports de refroidissement
it: Cestelli per raffreddamento
ja: ケーキクーラー
nl: Afkoelroosters
no: Kjølerister
pl: Kratki pod gorące naczynia
pt: Prateleiras para esfriar alimentos
ru: Решётки для охлаждения
sv: Avsvalningsgaller
tr: Yiyecek Soğutma Rafları

en: Cutting Boards
xx: Cutting Boards
cs: Prkénka na krájení
da: Skærebrætter
de: Schneidebretter
es: Tablas de cortar
fr: Planches à découper
it: Taglieri
ja: まな板
nl: Snijplanken
no: Skjærefjøler
pl: Deski do krojenia
pt: Tábuas de corte para cozinha
ru: Кухонные доски
sv: Skärbrädor
tr: Kesme Tahtaları

en: Dish Racks & Drain Boards
xx: Dish Racks & Drain Boards
cs: Odkapávače nádobí
da: Opvaskestativer og opvaskebakker
de: Geschirrständer & Abtropfflächen
es: Escurreplatos
fr: Égouttoirs à vaisselle, Egouttoir
it: Scolapiatti e piani di scolo
ja: 水切りかご
nl: Bordenrekken en afdruiprekken
no: Tallerkenstativer og tørkeplater
pl: Stojaki na naczynia i suszarki do naczyń
pt: Escorredores de pratos e escoadores
ru: Сушилки для посуды и сливные полки
sv: Diskställ och torkställ
tr: Bulaşıklıklar ve Süzme Tezgahları

en: Dough Wheels
xx: Dough Wheels
cs: Kolečka na těsto
da: Dejskærere
de: Teigräder
es: Cortapastas extensibles con ruedas
fr: Roulettes à pâtes
it: Tagliapasta
ja: パイカッター
nl: Deegwielen
no: Kakehjul
pl: Noże do ciasta
pt: Cortadores de massa
ru: Резаки для теста
sv: Kaksporrar
tr: Hamur Tekerlek Kesiciler

en: Electric Knife Accessories
xx: Electric Knife Accessories
cs: Elektrické nože – příslušenství
da: Elektrisk kniv – tilbehør
de: Elektromesserzubehör
es: Accesorios para cuchillos eléctricos
fr: Accessoires pour couteaux électriques
it: Accessori per coltelli elettrici
ja: 電動ナイフ関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor elektrische messen
no: Tilbehør til elektriske kniver
pl: Akcesoria do noży elektrycznych
pt: Acessórios para faca elétrica
ru: Принадлежности для электроножей
sv: Tillbehör till elektriska knivar
tr: Elektrikli Bıçak Aksesuarları

en: Electric Knife Replacement Blades
xx: Electric Knife Replacement Blades
cs: Náhradní ostří k elektrickým nožům
da: Elektrisk kniv – udskiftelige blade
de: Elektromesser-Ersatzklingen
es: Hojas de recambio para cuchillos eléctricos
fr: Lames de rechange pour couteaux électriques
it: Lame di ricambio per coltelli elettrici
ja: 電動ナイフ用替刃
nl: Vervangingsbladen voor elektrische messen
no: Blader til elektriske kniver
pl: Ostrza zapasowe do noży elektrycznych
pt: Lâminas para faca elétrica
ru: Запасные лезвия для электроножей
sv: Utbytesblad till elektriska knivar
tr: Elektrikli Bıçak Yedek Uçları

en: Electric Knives
xx: Electric Knives
cs: Elektrické nože
da: Elektriske knive
de: Elektromesser
es: Cuchillos eléctricos
fr: Couteaux électriques, Couteau électrique
it: Coltelli elettrici
ja: 電動ナイフ
nl: Elektrische messen
no: Elektriske kniver
pl: Noże elektryczne
pt: Facas elétricas
ru: Электрические ножи
sv: Elektriska knivar
tr: Elektrikli Bıçaklar

en: Flour Sifters
xx: Flour Sifters
cs: Síta na mouku
da: Melsigter
de: Mehlsiebe
es: Tamices de harina
fr: Tamis à farine
it: Setacci per farina
ja: 粉ふるい
nl: Zeven voor bloem
no: Melsiktere
pl: Sitka do mąki
pt: Peneiras de farinha
ru: Сита для муки
sv: Silar
tr: Un Elekleri